Montana, session 2025, SB450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Findings of purpose -- amicus curiae briefing by officers of
legislature. (1) The legislature finds that:
(a) proper interpretation and administration of legislative enactments and referendums of the state
are matters of great public interest and significant importance; and
(b) the officers of the legislature have a strong interest in the subject matter of any litigation in
which the interpretation and administration of legislative enactments is at issue.
(2) The officers of the legislature may participate on an individual basis or jointly as amicus curiae
and file an amicus brief in state or federal court in actions involving statutory interpretation for legislative
enactments or legislative intent.
(3) Nothing in this section supersedes the authority of the attorney general to represent the state.
(4) The participation of an officer of the legislature in any action, state or federal, does not
constitute a waiver of legislative immunity or legislative privilege of any individual legislator, officer of the
legislature, or legislative staff.
(5) Subject to available appropriation authority, an officer of the legislature may use funding that is
approved by the legislative council or funding that is under the direction and control of the officer of the
legislature to pay attorney fees and costs associated with participating as amicus curiae under subsection (2).
(6) For the purposes of this section, "officer of the legislature" means the speaker of the house and
the president of the senate.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 450

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 450.1

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 5, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 5, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Applicability. [This act] applies to proceedings initiated on or after [the
effective date of this act].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 450